Idaho, session 2026, H0872.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-906, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-906. BALLOTS FOR GENERAL ELECTIONS. (1) There shall be a single
general election ballot on which the complete ticket of each political party
shall be printed. Each political party ticket shall include that party's
nominee for each particular office. The secretary of state shall design the
general election ballot to allow for write-in candidates when needed.
(2) The office titles shall be listed in order beginning with the high-
est federal office. The secretary of state has the discretion and authority
to arrange the above classifications of offices as provided by law.
(3) At any general election at which the electors are to vote upon con-
stitutional amendments or other issues, the secretary of state shall provide
separate general election ballot forms on which such amendments and issues
shall be printed.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.